Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska32-932
Person challenged as to right to vote; allowed to vote; when.

Any person challenged who complies with sections 32-927 to 32-931 shall be allowed to vote. Any person challenged who refuses to comply with sections 32-927 to 32-930 or to take the oath provided in section 32-931 for any election shall not be issued a ballot or permitted to vote.

Laws 1994, LB 76, § 275.

If a party challenged refuses to take oath, his vote should be rejected. Plouzek v. Saline County Reorganization Committee, 181 Neb. 440, 148 N.W.2d 919 (1967).